Massachusetts, session 194th, S2592.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 19 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after the ninth paragraph the following paragraph:-  
The program shall provide tuition and fee waivers for any resident of the commonwealth 
who has been the subject of a legal guardianship pursuant to section 5-201 of chapter 190B and 
who, upon reaching the age of 18 or upon enrolling in a Massachusetts institution of higher 
education, is living with a grandparent. The commonwealth, not the institutions of public higher 
education, shall bear the cost of these waivers after all reimbursements from the federal 
government have been exhausted.